Connecticut, session 2026, HB05457.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 29-303 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (a) The fire chief or local fire marshal with jurisdiction over a town,
4 city, borough or fire district where a fire, explosion or other fire
5 emergency occurs shall furnish the State Fire Marshal a report that shall
6 include (1) all the facts relating to its cause, its origin, the kind, the
7 estimated value and ownership of the property damaged or destroyed,
8 and (2) such other information as called for by the State Fire Marshal on
9 forms furnished by the State Fire Marshal, or in an electronic format
10 prescribed by the State Fire Marshal. The fire chief or fire marshal may
11 also submit reports regarding other significant fire department response
12 to such fire or explosion, and such reports may be filed monthly but
13 commencing January 1, 2008, such reports shall be filed not less than
14 quarterly.
sHB5457 / File No. 253 1

sHB5457 File No. 253
15 (b) For any fire or explosion that occurs at a facility, as defined in
16 subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 16-50i, that is a solar
17 photovoltaic facility, the local fire marshal shall also furnish the report
18 described in subsection (a) of this section to the Connecticut Siting
19 Council established under section 16-50j.
20 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Not later than thirty days
21 after the Connecticut Siting Council receives a report regarding a fire or
22 explosion that occurred at a facility that is a solar photovoltaic facility,
23 furnished pursuant to subsection (b) of section 29-303 of the general
24 statutes, as amended by this act, the council shall, in conjunction with
25 the local fire marshal who furnished the report, determine whether any
26 solar photovoltaic facility equipment at the facility was a contributing
27 factor to the fire or explosion. Notwithstanding any provision of chapter
28 277a of the general statutes, if the council determines, in conjunction
29 with the local fire marshal, that such equipment was such a factor, the
30 council shall initiate an amendment proceeding to amend the certificate
31 issued to the owner of the facility pursuant to said chapter. The purpose
32 of such amendment proceeding shall be to require the owner to adopt a
33 solar photovoltaic facility fire mitigation plan. Any such mitigation plan
34 adopted in accordance with this section shall include, but not be limited
35 to, an explicit description of the best management practices the owner
36 will employ, informed by the latest science at the time the plan is
37 formed, that will avoid, minimize and mitigate any fire or explosion
38 risks relating to solar photovoltaic facilities. For purposes of this section,
39 "facility" has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (3) of
40 subsection (a) of section 16-50i of the general statutes.
41 (b) Not later than one hundred eighty days after the conclusion of an
42 amendment proceeding that was initiated under subsection (a) of this
43 section and that resulted in the adoption of a solar photovoltaic facility
44 fire mitigation plan, the council shall determine if there are any facilities
45 in the state that are similarly situated to the facility that was the subject
46 of such order. If the council determines that there are any such similarly
47 situated facilities, the council may, notwithstanding any provision of
48 chapter 277a of the general statutes, initiate an amendment proceeding
sHB5457 / File No. 253 2

sHB5457 File No. 253
49 to amend the certificate issued to any owner of a similarly situated
50 facility pursuant to said chapter. The purpose of such amendment
51 proceeding shall be to require such owner to adopt the same solar
52 photovoltaic facility fire mitigation plan as the mitigation plan adopted
53 in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-303
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2(a), "the owner will employ, that are informed by the latest
science" was changed to "the owner will employ, informed by the latest
science" for clarity.
PS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5457 / File No. 253 3

sHB5457 File No. 253
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
CT Siting Council SCF1 - Cost 192,002 192,002
Note: SCF=Siting Council Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Connecticut Siting Council Fund of
$192,002 annually, beginning in FY 27. The bill requires the Siting
Council to determine whether any solar photovoltaic facility equipment
was a contributing factor in a fire or explosion. If so, the council must
initiate an amendment proceeding to amend the certificate issued to the
facility’s owner to require the owner to adopt a solar photovoltaic
facility fire mitigation plan.
It is estimated that the new requirements of the bill will result in one
full-time Siting Analyst 2 position, with an annual salary of $110,000 and
corresponding fringe benefits of $46,002. Additionally, it is estimated
that the additional requirements for solar photovoltaic facility
equipment will result in three additional Siting Council hearings,
annually, which will result in an additional cost of approximately
$36,000.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
1 Pursuant to Connecticut General Statutes (C.G.S.) §16-50r and §16-50v, the Council’s
budget is financed by fees and assessments paid to the Siting Council Fund.
sHB5457 / File No. 253 4

sHB5457 File No. 253
continue into the future subject to inflation and the number of additional
hearings, yearly.
sHB5457 / File No. 253 5

sHB5457 File No. 253
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5457
AN ACT CONCERNING FIRES AND EXPLOSIONS THAT OCCUR AT
SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC FACILITIES.